Hawaii statutes.
§171-47 Residence lots; improvement
districts. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the board
of land and natural resources is authorized, in like manner and subject to the
same conditions, including the imposition of liens and the payment of costs, as
any subdivider of private lands, to petition for the construction of necessary
subdivision improvements pursuant to applicable improvement district statutes
or ordinances of any county or city and county in subdividing public lands for
residential purposes. The board shall dispose of the residential lots so
improved subject to liens consisting of the improvement assessments. For the
purpose of this section the board is authorized to encumber and impose liens on
public lands. [L 1965, c 239, §24; Supp, §103A-44.5; HRS §171-47]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next